 And we've got mice that are 4 months old,
 Professor Ehud Ur in de geneeskunde aan Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, tevens voorzitter van de klinische en wetenschappelijke divisie van de Canadian Diabetes Association, herinnerde eraan dat ze nog maar net zijn begonnen met het onderzoek.
 Net like some other experts,
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Nobel Committee for literature at the Swedish Academy, announced on a radio program on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the committee had been unable to reach Bob Dylan to tell him that he had won the Nobel Prize for literature in 2016, and would make no further effort to do so.
 Danius explained,
 Earlier, Jamie Siminoff, the Ceo of Ring, noted that the company was founded when his doorbell from the store couldn't be heard in his garage.
 He said he made a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said the sales increased after he appeared on Shark Tank in 2013, where the show's panel of investors did not want to finance the start-up.
 End of 2017, Siminoff was seen on the teleshopping channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with the ADT Corporation.
 One experimental vaccine seems to be able to reduce Ebola deaths, but so far no drugs have been clearly shown to be effective in treating existing infections.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, was initially promising in the field.
 ZMapp was a control in the PALM trial, so scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments to it.
 The U S . Olympic Committee has the support of USA Gymnastics and understands that it is necessary for the Olympic family to promote a safe place for all athletes.
 We join the USOC in stating that it is best for our athletes and clubs, and their sport, to make meaningful changes in our organization instead of taking away certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent review that can provide more clarity on how abuse of this magnitude, that was so bravely described by the victims of Larry Nassar, could go unnoticed for so long, and embraces all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal: to ensure that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and empowering environment.
 During the 1960s,
 He advised Carter during the 1976 Presidential campaign on foreign policy, and then served as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981.
 As NSA stood by Carter in the diplomatic handling of worldwide issues, such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the stabilization of the U S .-China relationship at the end of the 1970s and the Iranian Revolution, the subsequent hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone was nominated for all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for best actor and best actress.
 Among the other nominations were best film, director, cinematography, costume design, film editing, original music, production design, music, sound effects and original screenplay.
 The numbers Audition and City of stars from the film were nominated for best original song. Lionsgate hauled in 26 nominations, a record for a studio.
 In a statement from his press Secretary,
 The announcement came after a telephone call between Trump and the Turkish President, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Also, the Turks said they would guard the captured ISIS fighters,
 This not only supports the widely held theory that dinosaurs had feathers,
 According to scientists,
 The find also gives insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The researchers concluded that the rachis was probably a later evolutionary development,
 The structure of the feathers seems to indicate that they were not used for flying, but for regulating the temperature or for how it looked.
 Despite the fact that it's the tail of a young dinosaur,
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded at the main police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey.
 Among the wounded are nineteen police officers,
 The police suspect a Daesh Militant.
 Here it became clear that the sun follows the same basic principles as other stars.
 The brightness and rotation are used to determine the Rossby number of a Star.
 The fewer Rossby waves,
 Iwasaki ran into trouble at several points.
 Pirates robbed him, a mad dog bit him in Tibet, he escaped from a marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard is compatible with both frequencies,
 If the base station has dual radios,
 The speeds of 802.11n are substantially faster than those of its predecessors, with a maximum theoretical capacity of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall is married with two children and made no great impression on Miller, to whom the story was related.
 During the trial,
 We do our utmost to reduce the carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP in 2020 by a considerable margin compared with the level of 2005.
 He has not set any figures for the cuts,
 Hu urged developing countries to avoid the old way of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 And he added,
 The Iraqi study group presented their report today at 12.00 GMT.
 No one can guarantee that no single act of trade in Iraq at this moment will not end up leading to sectarian warfare, escalating violence or the tendency towards chaos.
 In the beginning of the report, there is a plea for an open discussion and for consensus-building in the USA over the policy with regard to the Middle East.
 In the report, strong criticism is made of virtually every aspect of the current policy towards Iraq, and it urges a radical change of course.
 The report contains 78 recommendations, the first of which is that diplomatic action should be taken this year to protect Iraq's borders against hostile powers and to restore diplomatic relations with neighbouring countries.
 The Argentine President's wife,
 Mevrouw Kirchner announced her intention to run for the Presidency at the Argentine theatre, where she started her campaign for the Senate in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires provincial Legislature.
 The debate arose from a discussion about investing and rebuilding after Hurricane Katrina.
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction work is directed at the awarding of reconstruction contracts to alleged insiders from Washington.
 The funeral was attended by more than four million people in Rome.
 There were so many people that not everyone could get into the funeral on the Sint-Pietersplein.
 At various places in Rome,
 Similar arrangements were made in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, and then especially in Poland.
 Historians have criticized earlier FBI policies,
 From the fiscal year 2005, the Congress funded the initiative against obscenity and declared that the FBI should deploy ten agents on adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the innings with 70 runs with just 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 In the middle order, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid played well and made one hundred runs together.
 But after India lost the wicket of the captain,
 President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore on November 16 for a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was received by Wong Kan Seng, the vice Premier of Singapore, and discussed trade and terrorism issues with the Prime Minister of Singapore, Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush spoke this week after the midterm elections,
 Premier Stephen Harper has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee for all parties to review, prior to the second reading, after the 25 minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton at PMO on Tuesday.
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister,
 Since the Federal Government took over the funding of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the government and some Federal parliamentarians have criticised this law as a stunt during the early period of the Federal election, which is being held in November.
 With the law,
 According to the latest bulletin,
 There is no major damage or serious injury, although the power was out for some time.
 But fourteen schools in Hawaii were closed.
 The leader of the United States,
 A spokesman for Bush, Gordon Johndroe, described the North Korean promise as a major step forward in our goal to denuclearize the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season that has been given a name, Subtropical storm Jerry, formed today over the Atlantic ocean.
 According to the National Hurricane center,
 According to calculations by the U S . Corps of Engineers,
 In the Ninth Ward, during Hurricane Katrina, the water was over twenty feet high.
 The water flows over a piece of 100 feet wide over the dike.
 The Commons-Beheerder Adam Cuerden expressed his frustrations over the deletion.
 He looged in principle all against us from the beginning.
 The frustrations within the community resulted in the current attempts to set a policy regarding the sexual content of the site that hosts millions of pieces of media content with an open license.
 The completed work was primarily theoretical in nature, but the program is written for the simulation of observations of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The team was looking for the effect that would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of the universe and that of the Milky way.
 Comparable to how the moon exerts its power on the earth,
 The researchers concluded that dark matter affects dark matter in the same way that it affects ordinary matter.
 According to this theory,
 On television footage you can see white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are warning residents to stay indoors,
 The Japanese nuclear agency reports that radioactive cesium and iodine have been detected at the plant.
 The authorities suspect that this indicates that containers with uranium fuel may have been torn open and leaking.
 XDR-TB was discovered by Dr Tony Moll in the KwaZulu-Natal province of South Africa.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is
 Some of the patients,
 A sick person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts in a year.
 The percentage of XDR-TB amongst all TB patients seems to be still at the low end,
 The satellites, which weighed both more than 1,000 pounds and were moving at about 17,500 miles per hour,
 Scientists say that a huge explosion was caused by the collision.
 They're still trying to figure out how big the impact was,
 The United States Strategic Command,
 On an open Website, the result of the plot analysis is posted.
 According to official sources in Ohio,
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in his T-shirt, underwear and heavily medicated state along a highway in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati.
 She sent officers to her black Oldsmobile intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 On this spot they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, age 53, which was covered with bloody sheets.
 The police said that the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease were reported this season at the end of July.
 Pigs carry the disease and carry it via mosquitoes to humans.
 The government of India has decided to deploy pig catchers in the worst hit areas of the country,
 The government has promised several million encephalitis vaccines,
 The plans to deliver vaccines this year to the places that have been hit hardest have been delayed because of a lack of funding and the low priority given to other diseases.
 Słania moved to Sweden in 1956, where he worked for the Swedish postal service as a chief engraver.
 He produced more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is recognized for the quality and detail,
 The beautiful stamp,
 For many countries he has brought engravings to the front of banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to the hospital,
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured.
 The vehicle itself was removed around 12.00 GMT.
 A garage employee said,
 They all rush back from the scene of the accident.
 On Bali, there are also other issues on the agenda, such as the protection of remaining forests in the world, as well as sharing technologies to help developing countries to grow in a less polluting way.
 The V.N. also hopes to set up a fund to help countries that are suffering from the effects of global warming.
 Overstromingsbestendige huizen,
 Some people tried to stop women from speaking out about women's health,
 Based on the many positive comments and support from both men and women who found that contraception should be considered a medical necessity.
 Toen de gevechten stopten nadat de gewonden naar het ziekenhuis waren getransporteerd, bleven ongeveer 40 of de andere overgebleven gevangenen op de binnenplaats en weigerden terug te keren naar hun cellen.
 Negotiators made a last ditch effort to get the situation back on track, but the demands of the prisoners are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 23:00 local time,
 The agents,
 The fire Department could give the signal at 11:35.
 The seasonal flooding,
 This sediment was needed for creating sandbars and beaches, which served as habitats for wild animals.
 The result was that two species died out,
 After the flood, the water level will only rise a few meters, but officials hope that this is enough to restore the eroded sandbanks that lie downstream.
 There is no tsunami warning.
 There was no tsunami threat, but residents panicked and left their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey took her leave with tears in her eyes,
 And I'm like,
 Namibian Presidential and Parliamentary elections have been won by the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, with a large lead.
 At the moment, the SWAPO,
 The coalition and Afghan troops went into the area to secure the location, and another coalition aircraft was sent in to provide support.
 The helicopter crashed high in mountainous terrain and it is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 Attempts to locate the site of the disaster are hampered by the bad weather and the rugged terrain.
 According to the medical charity,
 Richard Veerman, spokesperson for Doctors without Borders, says,
 It was a beautiful day when the tournament started at 10 a.m.
 The favorite of the tournament, South Africa, started off with a comfortable win of 26-00 against the 5th-placed Zambia.
 Although they played extremely tough against their Southern cousins,
 They fell by their stiff defense, control of the ball and outstanding cooperation and were clearly the main opponent.
 Amsterdam officials and employees of the Anne Frank House state that the tree has a fungus and is a danger to public health, because the tree, according to them, could fall.
 The tree was to be cut down on Tuesday,
 The entrances to the cave were called the seven sisters,
 Infrared images show that the temperature at night and during the day differs, and they show that it's probably caves.
 Over the day they are cooler than the surrounding surface,
 And it's not as stable as the deep earth.
 In France, there is, of course,
 And then the voter puts the envelope in the ballot box.
 The process is relatively narrowly defined in the French electoral law.
 Stembussen must be transparent, so that both voters and observers can see that no envelopes are added to the ballot box at the beginning of the vote, and that no other envelopes are added than those of registered and authorized voters.
 The candidates can send representatives to be witnesses of every part of the process. Volunteers count the votes in the evening under strict supervision and according to specific procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, which was launched worldwide earlier for cost-saving and diverse functionalities, was extensively discussed in the Taipei IT Month of 2007.
 The consumer market for laptop computers is however very diverse and changed, after ASUS in 2007 got the Taiwan Sustainable Award conferred by the executive yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website of the station describes the show as an old school radio drama with a new and unheard of twist.
 In the beginning, the show was only broadcast via the long-running radio Website Toginet radio,
 At the end of 2015, the AstroNet Radio station was founded.
 Originally, local amateur voice actors from the East of Texas.
 The widespread looting went on,
 Bishkek was described by one person as an anarchist state,
 In Bishkek, the unrest was blamed by many on demonstrators from the south.
 In the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in the South African town of Rustenburg,
 The final score was a one point,
 For the Springboks finally won, after five games in a row.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks,
 The last match of the series is next week in Ellis Park in Johannesburg, as the Springboks play in Australia.
 Monday at 10:08 am, the West of Montana was shaken by a moderate earthquake.
 There were no reports of damage.
 The earthquake occurred about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon, and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 Monday a dead wild duck was found in the marshland near Lyon in the east of France, which has been confirmed to have been infected with the H5N1 bird flu virus.
 In the European Union,
 Presumed H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers complained to God for the widespread killing,
 Agnost Chambers stelt that his rechtszaak is frivool and that everyone can aanklagen.
 The French opera is a story by Camille Saint-Saens and it's about an artist whose life is ruled by the love of drugs and Japan.
 As a result, performers smoke cannabis on the stage.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich,
 When the results were known, Gingrich praised Santorum, but criticized Romney,
 He said, quote,
 The winner of the Ames Straw poll in August,
 And then he was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center,
 I was not present or directly involved in this unfortunate event, but I hold the family of the victim in my thoughts.
 The photographer allegedly refused.
 The driver of the vehicle,
 But there are only eighteen medals awarded each day,
 Amongst them are the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen yesterday became ninth in the standing class for women in the Super-G, and Finland, where Katja Saarinen became tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley ended eleventh of the men in the standing Super-G.
 Arly Velasquez of Mexico ended up in the fifteenth place at the men's Super-G.
 The Polish mannenteam skiier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska were thirtieth in the Super-G.
 The UN peacekeeping force, which came to Haiti after the earthquake of 2010, is being held responsible for the spread of the disease that has broken out in the camp of the troops.
 From the lawsuit it has been proven that the waste from the UN camp was poorly treated, and this allowed bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, which is one of the largest rivers in Haiti.
 Haiti had not had the disease since 1800,
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti spoke to independent students who said the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion had brought the disease with them.
 According to Danielle Lantagne,
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient is in Howard University Hospital and is in stable condition.
 The patient had been to Nigeria,
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, which included isolating the patient to prevent others from being infected.
 Before The Simpsons,
 He also appeared in the films,
 In 1989, he worked with Brooks and Groening on the Simpsons,
 After his departure from the series in 1993,
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua reported earlier that a plane had been hijacked.
 And from later reports,
 From first reports, it appears that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after it was not allowed to make an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Airplane accidents are common in Iran. They have an outdated fleet that is poorly maintained.
 Door international sanctions,
 Earlier this week, an accident with a police helicopter
 Last month, Iran experienced the worst airplane crash in years.
 In the same month, a passenger plane crashed into a wall in Mashhad, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the rest of their tour.
 The tour would have been the band's first North American tour in five years.
 They canceled the tour after Steven Tyler got hurt.
 Murray won the second set in a tiebreak.
 Del Potro had an early lead in the second set, but here too a tiebreak followed after it had been 6-6.
 Potro was then treated at his shoulder, but managed to continue the match.
 The local start time of the program was 20.30 hours.
 Famous singers from all over the country sang bhajans or religious songs at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening started with the singer Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakka Singh also presented the Chhappan bhog bhajan. The singer Raju Khandelwal helped him with this.
 Then Lakkha Singh sang the bhajans.
 Aan Baba Shyam were served 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog.
 Lakkha Singh has also presented the Chhappan bhog bhajan.
 Thursday, Nintendo's director, Satoru Iwata, revealed the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution.
 Net like a TV remote,
 With this, players control actions and movements in Video games by moving the device through the air.
 Shortly after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and was out of the race.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso led most of the race, but lost the position directly after his pit stop, probably because of a badly placed right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher did not finish his race long after Alonso,
 In a transcript of the news conference,
 I was moved every time we repeated it,
 On an internal camera,
 However, it is likely that they did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 The director of NASA's shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had fallen off after the period of time we were concerned about.
 Na vijf minuten begint de wind, en een minuut later bereikt de wind al zo'n 70 km/u... dan begint het te regenen, but zo hard and zo much that it feels like needles on your skin.
 I lost my sister and her friend.
 In addition, the NHK reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reports that the earthquake has caused no problems and that in the Shika nuclear power station reactors 1 and 2 have been stopped.
 According to reports,
 Some roads are closed,
 One bomb exploded outside the governor-general's office.
 Within a period of two hours,
 In some reports, the official death toll is estimated at eight.
 In urine samples from pets that had died after eating contaminated pet food, both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 Researchers from the University stated that the two connections react with each other, thereby forming crystals that can block the function of the kidneys.
 Wetenschappers came to the conclusion that crystals are formed in cat urine when you add Melanin and Cyanuric acid to it.
 The composition of these crystals has similarities with that of the urine of the affected pets, compared with infrared spectroscopy.
 I don't know if you realize this, but most of the goods from Central America came into this country without paying any duty.
 And yet eighty percent of our goods were taxed at rates from countries in Central America.
 I thought that was very unfair.
 What I'm trying to say is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, has signed a bill into law that will ban the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 Under this law, violent Video games that are sold in the state of California must have an '18' sticker.
 Kier Starmer QC, director of the public prosecution service, has this morning said that he will prosecute both Pryce and Huhne.
 Huhne has resigned. In the cabinet, Ed Davey is his replacement, while Norman Lamb is expected to take over Davey's role as Minister of Trade.
 On the 16th of February,
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver of the vehicle.
 Edgar Veguilla was wounded in the arm and the jaw, and Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo a reconstructive facial operation.
 The weapon of Uka failed while it was aimed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has chronic pain, is blind in one eye, has a piece of his skull missing, and his face has been reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider via Video-Link from a U S . Air Force base in the country from which he had come.
 Besides the event of Wednesday, Carpanedo also participated in two individual races of the championship.
 Her first was the Slalom, where she got a Did Not Finish at her first run.
 In the other race she competed in, the downhill,
 Four skiers from the women's group for the sitting slalom could not finish their runs and it took 45 of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom to place themselves during the race.
 The stolen laptop and mobile phone have been recovered by the Madhya Pradesh police.
 Five of the rapists of the Swedish woman have been arrested,
 Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar are the suspects.
 According to police Commissioner Chandra Shekhar Solanki,
 There were three people in the house when the car hit the house,
 The driver, however, was badly injured.
 The way where the accident happened was temporarily closed while the emergency services tried to free the driver from the red Audi TT.
 Initially he was admitted to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya was sentenced in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court for the murder of her son.
 She is in custody awaiting the charge and the trial, but the eyewitness report is possibly misleading because her story has been published many times.
 But in Scotland,
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee remarks that journalists play a dangerous game when they publish photographs of suspects.
 Crown Office has overall control over prosecutions and has told journalists that no further statements will be made, at least until charges are laid.
 According to sources, the document refers to a settlement, something the Palestinians would like to see based on the borders before the war in the Middle East in 1967.
 And other topics that were discussed were the future status of Jerusalem, a city that is sacred to both peoples, and the problems in the Jordan Valley.
 Israeli officials say that the Palestinian Authority is only willing to allow a five-year military presence in the West Bank.
 Schutters in de aanvullende proef voor ongediertebestrijding moesten nauwlettend in de gaten worden gehouden door boswachters. De proef werd namelijk gevolgd en de effectiviteit ervan werd beoordeeld.
 At a collaboration between the NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn,
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a nine-member provisional electoral Council.
 In the past four years,
 The Presidential Commission has recommended the dismissal of the former National Election Commission.
 The Commission was established by Martelly as a response to widespread protests against the government that have been taking place since October.
 The sometimes violent protests erupted over the failure to hold elections, some of which had been scheduled to take place since 2011.
 There have been about 60 cases reported of defective iPods that overheat,
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry,
 Last week, METI announced that apple had reported 34 additional incidents of overheating that the company had deemed not serious.
 And the minister said,
 Mariana was hit by the earthquake at 07.19 local time.
 The office for calamity management of the northern Marianas Islands declared that there has been no damage reported.
 In addition, the National Tsunami Warning Center reported that there was no tsunami warning.
 In Manila, the Philippine capital, a former Philippine policeman has hijacked a bus full of Hong Kong tourists.
 With his M16-gun, Rolando Mendoza shot on the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued,
 The other three were released earlier, including the children and the elderly.
 Later the photographers returned in exchange for an older woman who had to go to the toilet.
 Liggins went into medicine,
 Educated as a midwife,
 When he was working in the hospital,
 His research showed that the ripening of the foetal lungs of babies was speeded up by the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua reported that government researchers found two black boxes with flight recorders.
 Also, the worst of the worst.
 Tommy Dreamer said,
 Dustin Runnels said that Luna was as weird as me,
 Of the 1400 people who were surveyed,
 The Australian people,
 Seventy two percent of the participants in this poll,
 29 percent of the respondents thought that Australia should become a Republic as soon as it was possible, and at the other end, 31 percent said that it should never become a Republic.
 The Olympic gold Medalist swam the 100 and 200 meter freestyle and three relay events during the Commonwealth games, but his condition was questioned due to his complaints.
 He couldn't take the medication he needed to ease his pain because it was banned at the Olympics.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered on January 25 the currently largest known prime number.
 Several people verified the discovery using different hardware and software,
 Comets could have been a source,
 They hope to gain insight into the way planets are formed.
 Cuomo, a Democrat,
 He called the gossip political nonsense and chatter.
 He is expected to run for President in 2016.
 With the NextGen system,
 It uses satellite-based technology,
 No additional transport will be put in place and no surface trains will stop at Wembley.
 A possible lack of transportation made it more likely that the match would be played behind closed doors and without supporters.
 A study published Tuesday in the scientific Journal,
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden, reported that new species evolved within two generations.
 Gold can be worked into many forms.
 It can be drawn into a narrow thread, which can be twisted and woven.
 After it has been made quite thin,
 This is called the pH value of a chemical.
 And then the color of the vinegar changes based on the pH.
 Based on the amount of hydrogen ions,
 Hydrogen atoms consist of one proton and one electron,
 Now, mix the two powders together,
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers,
 In the cities of Harappa and Mohenjodaro,
 There are sewerage remains found in houses in the Minoan cities on the Greek Islands of Crete and Santorini.
 In the olden times,
 When you call someone who's thousands of miles away,
 As soon as the satellite receives the call,
 The satellite is shot into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts some of our light and image.
 To put a satellite or telescope into space,
 The most important thing the wheel has given us is an easier and quicker transportation.
 The train, the car, and many other means of transportation are the result of this.
 There are cats of average size,
 There are also many small cats,
 And his success comes from the idea of a niche,
 Cats are the most social of cats and live in large groups called troops.
 Troepen bestaan uit een tot drie volwassen mannetjes die familie zijn van elkaar en hebben ook tot wel dertig vrouwtjes en welpen.
 Women are normally related to each other and form a great family of sisters and daughters.
 A troop of lions behaves in much the same way as a pack of wolves or dogs,
 The tiger is a versatile athlete and can climb, although not well, swim, jump great distances, and has five times the pulling power of a strong person.
 The tiger belongs to the same group as lions, leopards, and jaguars.
 A tiger does not roar out of full power like a lion.
 The favorite meal of ocelots are small animals. They catch monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds if they can.
 Scholars suspect that ocelots use their sense of smell to hunt small animals,
 They can see through the night,
 When a small group of organisms,
 In this new environment,
 Because they still need the same adaptations as before.
 As the new population began to adapt to the new environment,
 And so,
 And this process is called speciation.
 Plants produce oxygen that people inhale and they take up carbon dioxide that people exhale.
 By means of photosynthesis, plants take their nutrients from the sun.
 Our houses and clothing are made of plants. We eat mainly plants. Without plants, animals would not survive.
 He stood at the top of the food chain.
 His long jaws had more than 70 sharp teeth, plus an extra set in the cheek, which means nothing or no one could escape him.
 It is not certain, but it is possible that his tongue was forked.
 In waterpartijen was also nothing safe for the attacks,
 Although the majority of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans also had their share of strange or unusual delicacies, including wild boar, peacock, snails, and a kind of rodent that was called a dormouse.
 And Besides, there was a difference.
 Meals from Roman antiquity contain no food that came from the Americas or Asia to Europe in later centuries.
 They didn't have maize, tomatoes, potatoes, cacao.
 The Babylonians made a primary temple for all their gods.
 Men brought offers to the gods and the priests tried to satisfy the needs of the gods by organizing ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had an open courtyard and a back room that was only accessible to priests.
 Sometimes, as part of the temples,
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 Houses were not of great importance in the warm climate of the Middle East.
 The daily life of the Hebrew family took place mostly out of doors.
 Women cooked in the garden,
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests,
 Groenland had few inhabitants. According to Norse legends, Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder, found Greenland on his way west, and gave it its name.
 But there were Eskimos there.
 Although all of them were Scandinavian,
 Perhaps you think after the movie National Treasure that there is a treasure map behind the Declaration of independence.
 But it's not a treasure map.
 On the back of the American Declaration of Independence,
 Although no one knows for sure who wrote it,
 It seems like it's just added as a label.
 Thanks to the D-Day landings and the fighting that followed,
 It was ruled by Vichy-France.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France.
 The Americans and the Free French had liberated Southern France within just two weeks.
 A civilization is a single culture that is shared by a large group of people who live and work together in a society.
 From the Latin civilis, which means citizen,
 A civilization with a culture suggests that knowledge is passed on over generations, a permanent cultural footprint and a balanced distribution.
 When minority cultures disappear,
 During the revolution, thirteen States formed a weak central government,
 It lacked the power to levy taxes,
 Also it did not have the power to override state tax laws.
 First, all the states had to unanimously agree to the articles, before they could be amended, but the states did not take the national government so seriously that their representatives often were absent.
 The Italian national football team is, together with the German team, the second most successful team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and F1 motor racing.
 Winter sports are especially popular in the northern regions, where Italians participate in international competitions and Olympic events.
 Japan consists of nearly 7,000 Islands.
 Because of the cluster of Islands,
 The history of Taiwan begins in the 15th century, when sailors from Europe sailed along the island and gave it the name Ilha Formosa, or beautiful Island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company established a base in the South-West of Taiwan,
 In the year 1683, the Western and Northern coastal areas of Taiwan were conquered by the Qing dynasty,
 After the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese war,
 Consisting of three large constructions,
 The largest part of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been rebuilt so that tourists get a better idea of how they looked before.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was restored.
 For example, worldwide, the most common photographic format for still images is 35 mm, which was the usual film format at the end of the analogue film era.
 These are produced up to the present day, although it is primarily the ratio of the image that the digital camera's image sensor has taken over.
 Oddly enough,
 The aspect ratio of this size,
 Many common indelings,
 The rule of thirds, which is often derided,
 The most effective place for the main subject is at the intersection of the lines.
 In this period in the history of Europe,
 For more than a thousand years,
 From the King to the common citizen,
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to relieve suffering and poverty, and the church has the means to do this.
 The church had been the central authority in Rome for over a thousand years,
 The British Navy,
 The strategy was effective,
 Britain has placed mines in international waters,
 Because of the limited response to this tactic,
 During the nineteen twenty s,
 After the first World War,
 Tesla emigrated to the United States of America in 1884 to work at the Edison company in New York City.
 When he came to the United States,
 The old China had a unique way of representing different periods of time,
 Also between the different dynasties,
 There were fierce wars between different nobles who fought for the throne.
 In the history of ancient China, the period of the three kingdoms is one of the bloodiest.
 The Revolution has had great social and political consequences, such as the use of the metric system, a shift from absolute monarchy to republicanism, nationalism, and the idea that the land belongs to its inhabitants instead of a single leader.
 For all male applicants,
 The same goes for the Army.
 The French Revolution inspired also in other countries the oppressed working class to revolt.
 He spent a lot of time in a cave,
 The cave itself, which has withstood the tooth of time,
 The cave is situated on one of the mountain tops on the North side of Mecca,
 Even though it was known that the cave existed,
 The only thing to be seen is the clear, beautiful air and the many surrounding mountains.
 The great pyramid of Giza stands as the only one of the seven wonders of the world still standing.
 The great pyramid was built in the third century BC by the Egyptians and is one of the many great pyramid structures erected to the memory of a dead pharaoh.
 The plateau of Giza, in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, contains several pyramids, including the Great Pyramid, several smaller tombs, a number of temples, and the great Sphinx.
 Many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built as tributes to Khufu's wives and family members.
 The up-bow sign looks like a V,
 Boven betekent that you must begin at the point and push the bow away.
 A upward movement usually gives a softer sound, while a downward movement produces a stronger and more assertive sound.
 Take the liberty of sketching your personal marks, but remember that the printed staccato marks are there for a musical reason, and therefore must be respected.
 A group of market women sat behind the departure of the doomed Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette and their two young children, Marie-Therese of eleven and Louis-Charles of four, and the King's sister, Madame Elizabeth, from Versailles to Paris.
 They returned to the French capital in a carriage, surrounded by jeering and threatening mobs.
 Door de acties of the menigte mensen were the King and Queen forced to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At a given moment,
 The war costs of U S . imperialism with regard to the conquest of the Philippines have been paid by the people of the Philippines.
 They were imposed on the American colonial regime to pay for a large part of the costs,
 The American imperialism rested for a large part on the enormous profit of the long exploitation of the Philippines.
 To understand the Templars,
 The period in which this happened is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages, the European history in the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries.
 After the early Middle Ages came the high Middle Ages,
 Technological determinism is a term for a wide assortment of ideas in practice: from technological necessity or the technological imperative to a strict sense that human destiny is driven by an underlying logic that is linked to scientific laws and the appearance of them in technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism have these two general views: the development of technology follows a trajectory that for the most part extends beyond cultural or political influence, and that technology in turn has 'effects' on societies that are inherent rather than socially conditioned.
 Some will say, for example,
 But a national road network is economically not feasible for but a few cars.
 The mass production of cars also leads to more accidents on the road, and this leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health care to repair the human body.
 In the romanticism,
 In the Romanticism, geography formed the individual, and after a while, customs and cultures arose as a result of this geography, which formed a harmonious society and were better than the arbitrary laws imposed.
 Constantinople was seen as the fashion capital of feudal Europe,
 It stood from about 400 to 1100 as an epicenter of luxury.
 The status of the Empire took a hit in the twelfth century,
 At this time Paris also took the title of fashion capital from Constantinople.
 The Gothic period
 Clothing was in the beginning strongly influenced by Byzantine culture from the East.
 Because of the slow communication channels,
 At the end of the Middle Ages,
 Self-Sustaining Agriculture is Agriculture whereby enough food is produced to meet the needs of the farmer and his family.
 Agriculture with the goal of subsistence is a simple system that is mostly biological, using stored seed that is native to the ecoregion, and combined with rotating crops or other relatively simple techniques to maximize the yield.
 In many developing countries,
 Subcultures provide a way for people who feel alienated by mainstream society to find a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by age, ethnicity, social class, location, and gender.
 A subculture can be defined by the following kinds of qualities: linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of these factors.
 Members of a subculture often show which group they belong to by a certain symbolic style in what they wear, in how they behave, and the jargon they speak.
 One of the most used methods for illustrating the importance of socialization was the pair of sad cases of children who, through neglect, adversity, or wilful misuse,
 Some of these children were locked up by their own parents,
 Onhandelbare kinderen have possibly experienced serious child abuse or a serious trauma before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Others again are said to have been brought up by beasts,
 A wild child who is not raised by humans may exhibit behavior that resembles the behavior of the animal that raised the child,
 Learning on a project basis should simplify and make education more interesting, but scaffolding goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a method, but a tool to support individuals who are dealing with a new learning experience, for example, a new computer program or who are starting a new project.
 Support can be both virtual and real.
 There is virtual scaffolding built into the software that asks questions,
 There are several reasons why children end up in foster care,
 No child should grow up in an environment where they are not cared for,
 We see the foster care system as a safe zone for these children.
 It is the intention that foster care provides a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education, and reliable health care.
 In the foster care system,
 On the Internet,
 The different characters of the Internet lead to new dimensions in the application of the uses and gratifications theory.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as important reasons for using the Internet.
 Eighmey and McCord introduced new motivation aspects such as personal involvement and sustained relationships when they investigated the public's reactions to Websites.
 But what are Micro-Expressions?
 It is said that no one can detect a lie by looking at micro-expressions.
 Oliver Sacks described in his essay,
 Other species, like dogs,
 There are two groups of genetic Variants.
 By mutation new genetic variability is added to the pool of expressed variability.
 For each generation,
 A primate with a digestive system that looks like ours can't get the amino acids it needs from the plant foods that are available on the savanna.
 And it can't be taken seriously.
 The easiest to find plant sources are the proteins in leaves and legumes, but unless they're cooked, they're difficult for primates like us to digest.
 Not only is animal food (ants, termites, eggs) lightly digestible, but it also contains a great deal of protein that contains all the essential amino acids.
 But all in all,
 Sleep onset is the reason you wake up during your normal sleep period and you fall back to sleep within a short time period,
 This is relatively easy by using a relatively soft alarm clock that brings you back to your awareness without you immediately being fully awake.
 As you're falling asleep,
 And other options based on the biorhythm are, for example,
 The amount of inner calm that a person has,
 The less stress, the more positive the life force.
 Everyone can enlighten his or her mind. Only your own stress and negativity stand in the way of this goal.
 The Tibetan Buddhism has its basis in the teaching of Buddha.
 The Tibetan Buddhism consists of a relatively simple core of Kundalini yoga, meditation, and a following of universal love.
 By yoga postures,
 The core of Tibetan meditation is yoga with a deity as a focus.
 Because Germany was a common enemy in World War II,
 The former allies stood two years after the war,
 The war would last for 40 years,
 Polish defenders held out only until September 17,
 These plans were however, in one night,
 Shipping goods by ship is the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the ocean.
 Traditionally, it is the job of the Navy to ensure that a country retains the ability to transport people and goods, while the ability of the enemy to transport people and goods is hampered.
 The U S . tried to get men and material across the Atlantic to Britain,
 The German Navy tried to counter this traffic at the same time,
 Net as the rest of Europe,
 It seems that the goats were domesticated
 In the olden days cultures and peoples began to keep her so that they could always easily get at her, her flesh, her milk and her skins.
 Gedomesticeerde geiten were most commonly kept in kuddes on a hill or other grazing area. They were then watched over by geitenhoeders, like the more familiar shepherd.
 In the 16th century,
 Although horse-drawn railways consisted only of rails of planks, the horses had to travel faster and to pull greater loads than on the somewhat difficult roads of that time.
 Dwarf bars were used to keep the rails in place.
 This soon became the customary practice,
 The first fully iron rails were laid in 1767.
 The first form of transport we know is walking.
 His predecessor, the Australopithecus,
 In Australopithecus fossils of 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, two-legged specialisations are found.
 We can live more environmentally friendly,
 It is in many cases just like a symptomatic treatment. But if we want more than a temporary solution, we have to identify the cause of the problems and get rid of it.
 The scientific and technological developments of human society have overwhelmingly changed the earth.
 On the morning of the fourth,
 Between one hundred and two hundred copies were made during the night.
 John Nixon held the public reading of the document for the first time on July 8 in the garden of Independence hall.
 One copy was sent to George Washington on July 6, and another was read to his troops on July 9 in New York.
 The 25 Dunlap-Blair copies are the oldest surviving copies of the document.
 But many people don't believe it.
 Many people don't regard them as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still make us think of dinosaurs.
 On their feet, they have claws and scales, they lay eggs and walk on their two hind legs, just like the Tyrannosaurus Rex.
 The manipulation of data that is coded in Binary digits,
 A Binary number can only have two values,
 Internal poisoning is possible not directly clear. Symptoms such as vomiting are so common that not directly a diagnosis can be made.
 The presence of open boxes of medicines or toxic household chemicals is the best indication of internal poisoning.
 Look at the label for specific first aid instructions for that particular gift.
 Entomologists call this group of insects,
 This term comes from an age-old agreement with bedbugs, which are insects that can parasitize very well on humans.
 Both rode roofwantsen as bedwantsen are nest-bound, they have adapted themselves to live in the nest or the house of their host.
 In the USA, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the most common neurological condition in both younger and middle-aged adults.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 From research it has been found that women have twice as much chance of getting MS as men.
 A couple can decide that it's not in their best interest,
 These women can choose to give their baby up for adoption.
 At an adoption,
 The scientific method is the most important goal of science.
 But it's more than just a test,
 Naturalists and philosophers turned to classical texts,
 The views of Aristotle with regard to science, including psychology, were accepted.
 The West snapped up Greek philosophy and science less and less as the knowledge of Greek declined.
 At physiological and behavioral rhythm perceptions, there is often a strong dependence on endogenous processes and the production via the biological clock.
 Most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals,
 Biological clocks are self-contained oscillators that go through a cycle for a certain period of time, even if there are no external signals to trigger it.
 The experiment of Hershey and Chase was one of the most important indications that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 At the one experiment,
 Mutations can have many different effects, depending on the type, the importance of the genetic material involved, and whether the affected cells are dividing or not.
 Only mutations in the germ cells are hereditary.
 People who like to visit natural areas,
 At this place one can hunt, fish, take photographs, observe birds, go to parks and study the ecosystem.
 One example is a visit to,
 Every morning people from small villages drive to their workplaces and pass people whose workplaces are in the village they have just left.
 Everyone in this dynamic transportation shuttle is in one way or another connected to and supports a transportation system based on private cars.
 The science indicates that through this huge carbon economy, the biosphere is no longer in the stable state that allowed human evolution to take place over the past two million years.
 Everyone participates in society and uses transportation systems, and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, problems with water quality or collapsing bridges are rare.
 How does it happen that there are so many complaints about transport systems,
 At a traffic stream,
 It is difficult to study the traffic flow,
 Ah, the best predictors of
 There are links between the three core properties to better represent traffic flow.
 With the help of those relationships,
 Insects began to fly as the first animals.
 The advantage of most insects is that they can fold their wings along their body.
 Hereby they can hide in a greater number of small places from predators.
 At the moment, only dragonflies and mayflies can't fold their wings.
 A few thousand years ago, Aristarchus said that the sun rotated around the sun.
 But many people believed the opposite,
 But you do.
 The Amazon River is the world's largest and second longest river,
 The Amazon is also the widest River on earth,
 Certainly,
 The main stream of the Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Although the building of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza remain unsurpassed in size and technical excellence of construction.
 The old Egyptians of the new Kingdom,
 There are approximately 800 inhabitants in Vatican City.
 Italian is the official language of the Vatican.
 Italian is the language spoken by the people who work there, while Latin is used during religious ceremonies.
 Everyone who lives in Vatican city is Roman Catholic.
 People have known the most basic chemical elements, like gold, silver and copper, from the ancient world, because they're all found in nature and it's reasonably easy to extract them with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle speculated that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 This looked more like what we know of the four States of matter,
 Legeringen are, in a way,
 Elements like calcium and potassium are metals.
 Legeringen can also contain a small amount of non-metal elements, for example, carbon.
 All things in the universe are made up of matter.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that there are a trillion atoms in the period at the end of this sentence.
 And for many people,
 The pen has, as newer writing methods have come into use,
 Nowadays, one writes messages on a computer screen without ever needing a pencil sharpener.
 You might wonder what's going to happen to the keyboard.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that it takes energy to bring a nucleus together with many protons and neutrons.
 Also if you lift a heavy car up a hill,
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus,
 The surface of the moon is marked by dust and rock. The crust is the outer layer of the moon.
 The crust is about 70 km thick at the nearest edge and 100 km thick at the other edge.
 The crust is thinner under the Maria and thicker under the highlands.
 There may be more mares on the side,
 In-Ho-Gent theories are there to find out what moves and attracts people.
 This theory suggests that people have certain needs and or desires that are internalized as they grow up.
 With these theories,
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Hertzberg's motivation-hygiene theory.
 Over the long term,
 This type of manager finds it difficult to make unpopular decisions and to take disciplinary action, to have performance reviews, to delegate and to hold people accountable.
 On the other side of the spectrum,
 Ultimately, the leader is responsible for the team's success and failure.
 Often, this leads to a chasm between the leaders and the team members.
 Virtual teams must meet the same standards of excellence as normal teams, although there are some small differences.
 In most cases, virtual team members are the first point of contact for their direct physical group.
 Often, they're more independent than traditional team members,
 The idea of a truly invisible team,
 The invisible team is the management team to whom each member reports.
 Why would an organization want to begin the time-consuming process of setting up a learning organization?
 Creativity and ingenuity come to light when all the means at hand are effectively used within the functional departments of an organization.
 The result of this is that the process of an organization that is working together to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 To enable innovation in an organization, management must stimulate a culture in which innovating, shared knowledge and organizational learning are central.
 According to Angel (2006), organisations can perform better with an approach based on the continuum model.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thereby allowing the research field to be narrowed and more precise data to be collected.
 The correlation between the pathology of the brain and behavior helps scientists during their research.
 It has long been known that different types of brain injury, trauma, wounds and tumors can affect and lead to changes in mental ability.
 Doordat there are more and more new Technologies,
 This gives us a lot of information and material to develop simulation models with which we get more insight into the processes of our mind.
 But it's also an essential part of computer science.
 Developing machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior falls under the umbrella of ai research.
 Some examples are management, planning, the ability to diagnose and answer questions from customers and recognition of handwriting, voice and face.
 These have become separate disciplines for finding solutions to problems in real life.
 Nowadays, this system of artificial intelligence is widely used in economics, medicine, technology, and military affairs, such as in various software applications for PCs and video games.
 For each class, many excursions are planned.
 Thanks to technological developments, virtual excursions are now possible. With these, pupils can view the artefacts in a museum, look inside an aquarium or see beautiful works of art.
 Virtual field trips are also a great way to look back on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 Each year, for example,
 Blogs can also help students to write better.
 Because students are often the most critical audience,
 Do Blogging also force students to learn more about the world around them?
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to extend their learning beyond the traditional school day.
 By good use, Blogs can help students to develop analytical and critical thinking skills, by actively engaging in the discussion on the Internet, students can find their own place in the context of other people's material and at the same time, determine their own position on certain issues.
 The bilingual capital of Canada is the charming Ottawa, full of art galleries and museums in which Canada's past and future are displayed.
 Further South you'll find Niagara falls.
 This sort of thing makes Ontario typical of Canada.
 Further North,
 A population comparison that will amaze many,
 The East African Islands are located along the East Coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest,
 The majority of the smaller Islands are independent countries or are connected with France and are known as luxurious beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam with them,
 The Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India, which marked the beginning of European influence and colonization in the fifteenth century.
 The region borders the Atlantic Ocean to the South and West, and the Sahel to the North.
 Women are advised to say that they are married,
 Also helps to do rings around it.
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can lead to behavior that they may see as intimidating, and it is customary to be followed, to have your arm taken, etc.
 Be clear when you reject a man and don't be afraid to stand up for yourself.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded in the 10th century BC by Berber fishermen. The city was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Merinids, and was known under the name of Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed the harbor and rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca.
 The Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city and named it Daru l-Bayad.
 In Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting places to shop.
 Around the old Medina,
 Goma is a tourist town in the Democratic Republic of Congo. The town is located near Rwanda, in the far East.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed when the Nyiragongo volcano erupted, and the city's main streets, and especially the city center, were buried.
 Although Goma itself is relatively safe,
 Besides, the city is the base for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano and you can find some of the cheapest trips for mountain gorilla tracking in Africa.
 With a boda-boda,
 And it's a bit of a joke.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor town,
 In 1990 it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 It was one of the main stops of the PBS exhibition,
 The city differs from the other cities in the country, because it has a more Arabic appearance than an African one.
 The Kruger National Park is located in the northeastern part of South Africa and runs along the border with Mozambique in the east, along the border with Zimbabwe in the North, and the Southern border is the Crocodile River.
 The park is divided into 14 eco-zones,
 As a major tourist attraction in South Africa, this park is the flagship of the South African National Parks.
 As with all South African national parks, there are daily conservation fees and entrance fees.
 It can also be useful to buy a Wild Card.
 The whole of Hong Kong is named after the Island of Hong Kong,
 The sheer number of buildings that make up the skyline of Hong Kong is like a glittering bar graph that becomes visible thanks to the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best view of Hong Kong,
 The vast majority of the population of Hong Kong lives very close to each other on reclaimed land along the northern coast.
 This is where the British settlers have settled, so if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of the area, then you can start here.
 The Sundarbans are the largest mangrove forests in the world, and stretch from the coast 80 km (50 miles) into the Indian and Bangladeshi interior.
 The Sundarbans are now officially on the UNESCO world heritage list.
 But the forests are more than just mangrove swamps they also contain some of the last great tracts of jungle that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km²,
 The Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary since 1966, and there are now an estimated 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Over the day, buses leave from the station on the border of the districts, mostly between 6.30 and 7.30 am, mainly in the direction of the East and Jakar/Bumthang.
 It is wise to buy a ticket a few days earlier, because the local buses are often full.
 In most neighborhoods, small Japanese Coaster-Buses that are comfortable and robust.
 With shared taxis,
 The Oyapock bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River to connect the Brazilian city of Oiapoque and the French Guianese city of Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock.
 The two towers have a height of 83 meters. The building has a length of 378 meters and has two passages with a width of 3.50 meters.
 Under the bridge is the door height 15 meters. In August 2011, the construction of the bridge was completed, but it only opened to traffic in March 2017.
 According to the planning, the bridge will be fully operational in September 2017.
 The Guaraní was the most prominent indigenous group.
 In the province of Chaco,
 Paraguay, formerly also called the great province of Indies, originated in the sixteenth century when Spanish colonists encountered the indigenous population.
 There followed a three hundred year period of colonization under the Spaniards.
 Asuncion was founded in 1537 and since then Paraguay has managed to retain much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 In December, the largest tournament of the year takes place on the polo fields in Las Cañitas.
 Here are also smaller tournaments and matches to be seen at other times of the year.
 Check the Argentine Polo Association for more information about tournaments and buying tickets for polo matches.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound.
 On the Islands there is only one bank, namely in Stanley opposite the shop FIC West. Here you can exchange money.
 In general, British pounds are accepted everywhere on the Islands, and in Stanley you can also often pay with credit cards and American dollars.
 On the remote Islands,
 Exchange your money again before you leave the Islands,
 So,
 In the summer months,
 The winter can be deceptively cold: the temperature almost never goes below zero, but the wind in combination with the humidity makes it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 The rainfall level remains about the same throughout the year, without any noticeable wet and dry periods.
 Many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, but wild animals are ultimately wild.
 Keep at least 100 meters away from bears and wolves, and 25 meters away from all other wild animals.
 Elk, buffalo, deer, and about all other big game can attack you, however tame they may seem.
 Every year, dozens of visitors get injured because they don't keep a proper distance. These animals are big, wild and potentially dangerous, so give them their space.
 Moreover, you must be aware that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid wearing or cooking odorous foods and keep the camping area clean.
 The capital of Samoa is Apia,
 Around the year 1850, Apia was founded and it is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain did not leave the harbor.
 Except for a British Slagship,
 In the independence struggle,
 There are many beaches,
 The North Shore beaches stretch from North to South along the Tasman sea, from Long Bay to Devonport.
 These are nearly all sandy beaches where it is safe to swim, and most of them have pohutukawa trees which give shade.
 At Waitemata's haven, in the luxury suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, located in central Auckland, you'll find the Tamaki drive beaches.
 These family beaches are sometimes crowded and have a good range of shops on the coast.
 Number one is the most important local beer,
 There are many French wines to be found, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps better suited for traveling.
 The local drinking water can be drunk safely, but bottled water is also easy to find if you don't trust it.
 A flat white is a strange concept for Australians.
 The warm chocolate milk is of Belgian quality.
 There are year-round dives to the Reef,
 Ask for expert advice and follow all signs and safety warnings.
 They are found from October to April,
 But sharks are not.
 The most important habitat of saltwater crocodiles is in the river mouths north of Rockhampton,
 Beforehand reserving ensures peace of mind for the traveler, knowing that he has a place to sleep when he arrives at his destination.
 But you can also,
 Reisbureaus often offer packages with breakfast and transportation to and from the airport, and sometimes even with flight and hotel.
 They can also hold your reservation if you need a little bit longer to think about the offer or if you need to get documents for your destination, like a visa.
 As if you have a request or a change,
 For some festivals, the majority of attendees at music festivals choose to camp on site, and most visitors regard this as an important part of the experience.
 As you get closer to the action,
 Also, even when the music on the main stages is over,
 For families with young children, there are special camping areas at some festivals.
 Let goed op where your hut zit as you's winters the Oostzee overgaat, cause the tocht through the ijs makes a enormous lawaai.
 Cruises to St Petersburg include time to explore the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements.
 Casinos are usually set up to get the most out of the time and money that guests spend.
 They have, normally,
 Some locations offer free alcoholic beverages. When people are drunk, however, it affects their judgment and all seasoned gamblers know that it is extremely important to remain sober.
 As you go up high into the mountains or over mountain passes, you have to take into account that there may be snow or ice and the temperature can be extremely low.
 On Icy and snowy roads,
 During snowstorms,
 Also, the view can be obstructed by falling or blowing snow, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle's windows.
 On the other hand, ice and snow are normal in many countries,
 The largest tourist attraction in Africa are safaris,
 The term safari refers to a trip,
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, often come close to cars, and a standard equipment makes a good view possible.
 If you want to see lions, cheetahs, and leopards,
 A walking safari,
 The Paralympics are from August 24 to September 5, 2021.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to host the Olympic Games twice.
 As if you had booked a flight and accommodation for 2020,
 But from the end of March,
 According to expectations,
 You can dry wet clothes by ironing them.
 As no iron is available,
 Make sure the fabric doesn't get too hot.
 You can purify water in a number of ways.
 In some areas, it's enough to boil water for a minute,
 Not every filter is even effective. In case of doubt, the best water to drink is from a sealed bottle from a trusted company.
 Travellers can get into trouble with animal pests that are not found in their own country.
 Ongedierte can spoil food, cause irritation, or in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, spread poison, or transmit infections.
 Normally speaking, infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that injure or kill people, are not considered pests.
 With tax-free shopping,
 Travellers who go to countries with high taxes on alcohol and tobacco can sometimes save a lot of money.
 Point Marion and Fairmont are connected via the Buffalo to Pittsburgh highway,
 Are you not used to driving on country roads?
 The posted maximum speeds are remarkably lower than in earlier and succeeding areas,
 Surprisingly,
 And in Bavaria,
 You see a lot of fruit cakes.
 Many popular German cookies contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts, and they taste great with a cup of strong coffee.
 As if you'd like a few small but mighty cookies,
 To make a curry, you need spicy and piquant ingredients,
 Depending on the amount of liquid, a curry can be either dry or wet.
 In the interior of North India and also in Pakistan, yogurt is often used in curries,
 The Indonesian cuisine comprises dishes from 17,000 Islands and is an overarching term for a variety of regional cuisines from all over the country.
 But without additional information,
 The Indonesian cuisine is nowadays available throughout the archipelago and offers several simple spiced dishes. The most common Indonesian tastes are nuts, peppers, sugar and various spices.
 The stirrups support the rider's feet and hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with more stability, but can also cause safety issues,
 As a rider of a horse is thrown off but with the foot in the stirrup,
 Most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, fairly narrow sole.
 Some saddles, and then especially English saddles,
 Cochamó Valley - This is the most popular climbing destination in Chile, and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with many different large granite walls and boulders.
 The mountain tops offer a breathtaking view. Climbers from all parts of the world are constantly discovering new routes on the rock walls which seem to have an endless potential.
 Winter sports, like skiing and snowboarding, are very popular.
 Skiing is a popular travel activity with many lovers, who are sometimes also called ski bums, who plan whole holidays around skiing at a particular location.
 Skiing has been around for a very long time.
 The beginning of skiing dates at least to the seventeenth century, and in 1861 the first recreational ski resort in Australia was opened by Noren.
 Backpacking with ski's: this activity is also called off-piste skiing, ski touring or ski hiking.
 It's not quite the same, but it's like alpine skiing or mountain climbing, which is done a lot on steep terrain.
 You can see the skiroute as a walking route.
 In good conditions, you can cover greater distances than by walking, but it rarely happens that you reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy backpack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries. Normally, travelers between different countries have to apply for multiple visas and go through passport controls.
 The Schengen area functions almost as one country.
 So long as you're in this zone,
 When you have a Schengen Visa, you do not need to apply for a visa to each Schengen country separately, which saves time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique.
 The definition can vary by location.
 It is possible to mark craft products as antiques, even though they are newer than similar mass-produced items.
 Under the Sami, reindeer herding is an important form of livelihood.
 But even traditionally,
 Many Sámi work today in modern professions. In Sápmi, the Sámi area, tourism is an important source of income.
 The word Gypsy is used,
 As for the country you're going to,
 You can also consult the advice of other governments.
 So Americans in the Middle East, for example,
 Advice includes only a brief summary of the political situation in a single country.
 They often give a fleeting,
 Noodweer is the general term for any dangerous weather phenomenon that can lead to damage, serious social disruption or the loss of human life.
 Overall, there are different types of weather,
 Examples of severe weather are high winds, hail, large amounts of precipitation, and forest fires, but also thunderstorms, tornadoes, water spouts, and hurricanes.
 Snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms are among other examples of regional and seasonal extreme weather phenomena.
 Travellers are advised to be aware of the risks that severe weather conditions in their surroundings may bring,
 Everyone who wants to visit a war zone should be professionally trained.
 A search on the Internet for a course in hostile environments probably brings up the address of a local business.
 In a course, all the issues that are raised here are usually dealt with in more detail,
 A course normally lasts from two to five days and consists of role-playing, a lot of first aid and occasionally some weapons training.
 There are many books and magazines with articles about surviving in the wilderness.
 Travellers who have planned a gender-affirming surgery abroad,
 It varies a lot of governments will issue passports without a gender marker,
 There is not much difference in the willingness of foreign governments to recognise these documents.
 Doorzoekingen at security checks have become much more extensive since 11 September 2001.
 Individuals who have not yet had surgery,
 Tides are the recurring movement of water in the ocean.
 Because of the underwater topography,
 Most of the deaths occur as a result of exhaustion,
 When you're out of the strong current,
 Try to aim at a place where you won't be grabbed again. Depending on your skills and whether you've been noticed, you can also wait for help.
 The shock of returning is worse than the culture shock,
 Travellers who adapt easily to new cultures sometimes have trouble adapting back to their own.
 As you have lived abroad and then returned,
 When you went abroad,
 Mostly, there's not expected to be patience and understanding for people who are returning home.
 For children, the pyramid show with light and sound is one of the most interesting activities in the neighborhood.
 You see the pyramids in the dark and you see them in all their quiet before the show begins.
 Often is the sound of vendors and tourists always audible.
 The Sphinx forms the background and is the narrator of a long story.
 The paintings appear as a projection on the pyramids,
 The South Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819 and have been claimed by several countries. They have the most bases, with sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km to the North of the peninsula. The largest island is King George Island, with the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas.
 And others are Livingston Island, and Deception.
 Ellsworth lies on the Southern end of the peninsula,
 Here the mountains of the peninsula turn into the plateau,
 The northern part, also known as the Sentinel Range,
 A satellite phone may be your only option in remote locations where there is no mobile phone reception.
 A satellite telephone is not really a replacement for a mobile phone,
 This service is often used by the shipping industry, including pleasure craft, and for expeditions where there is a need for external data and communication.
 Your local telephone provider can give you more information about how to connect to this service.
 It's becoming more and more popular.
 Especially school leavers make use of this to take a gap year without any negative consequences for their education.
 Often, a registration for a course abroad during a gap year can increase your chances of going back to higher education in your own country.
 Normaliter moet er for the enrollment for these educational programs college fees be paid.
 Finland is a fantastic destination to sail. The land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of Islands, in the lakes and in the archipelagoes off the coast.
 A yacht is not necessarily for the archipels or lakes.
 And the archipels off the coast,
 In Finland,
 The figure is equal to the figure of Norway, Sweden and New Zealand.
 At most Baltic cruises, a long stay in St . Petersburg, Russia, is included.
 You can spend a few full days in the historic town and spend the night on the ship.
 Since 2009,
 At some cruises, a visit to the German capital Berlin is included, but as you can see on the map, Berlin is not close to the sea.
 For people of all backgrounds and ages,
 It's not something to be ashamed of.
 As you know,
 For couriers,
 Larger companies could use their own planes for certain routes, but for other routes it became more difficult.
 As if it takes days,
 Only as checked baggage could this be processed more quickly. According to the rules of airlines, there must then be an accompanying passenger, and that's you.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class,
 This is not cheap: the rule of thumb is that you pay about four times economy for business, and about eleven times for first.
 It usually makes no sense to look for discounts on business class or first class tickets on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know all too well that there is a group of fliers who are willing to pay a lot of money to get somewhere fast and comfortably, and the airlines charge accordingly.
 Chişinău is the capital of Moldova.
 As a multi-ethnic Republic,
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in the east of Moldova.
 There are new economic ties between these two parts of Moldova,
 Orthodox Christianity is the main religion in Moldova.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with about 3.7 million inhabitants, the largest port after Istanbul and a good traffic hub.
 The once ancient city of Izmir is now a modern, developed and busy commercial center on a Bay, and is surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, the glass buildings and the modern shopping centers that are covered with red tiles, the 18th-century markets, the old mosques and churches,
 In the village of Haldarsvik,
 On a number of graves near the church are interesting marble duck sculptures.
 If you have half an hour,
 In the North, you'll find the easily accessible, romantic and fascinating place Sintra. Sintra became famous among foreigners after Lord Byron spoke highly of the beautiful monuments there.
 Scotturb-bus 403 rides regularly to Sintra, with a stop in Cabo da Roca.
 Go also to the North and see the beautiful shrine of Our Lady of Fatima, where internationally known Marian apparitions have taken place.
 On the other hand,
 Many men and women who have survived their time here are still alive, and many of them have loved ones who were murdered or who killed themselves.
 Toon during your visit all the appropriate respect, solemnity and dignity.
 Do not damage the site by marking or graffiti on the buildings.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish.
 But most of the signs are in Catalan,
 In the public transport and other facilities,
 Not all stations have this system,
 The people of Paris are known to be egotistical, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is usually just an incorrect stereotype, it can't hurt to put your best foot forward in Paris and to act like someone who is well-mannered.
 The hard outer shell of the Parisians disappears quickly when you show that you are familiar with their way of doing things.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested, and this heavily forested area consists mainly of beech, spruce and fir, and includes a combination of alpine and Mediterranean flora.
 There are a lot of different plant communities,
 This area is also the habitat of a very wide range of animal and bird species.
 There are rare animals like the European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the Wildcat and the Eagle Owl,
 When women visit a monastery, they are obliged to wear a robe to the knee,
 But if you bring your own,
 On the other hand, men should wear trousers to at least above the knee.
 You can also borrow it from the stock at the entrance, but this clothing is not washed after each use, so you may not feel comfortable in it. One size fits all for men.
 Like many other Mediterranean cuisines,
 A simple and popular dish for dinner,
 Independent nouns, like Sie, what you mean,
 On this way, you make a big difference between a number of verbs and nouns.
 It also makes reading easier.
 Most Italian words are written exactly as they are pronounced, so the pronunciation generally poses little problem.
 You must pay the most attention to the c and the g.
 Also, the r and rr must be pronounced differently.
 Persian language has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 Reading this introduction to the grammar will also teach you a lot about the grammar of Persian and help you to understand sentences.
 It is quite logical that if you know a Romance language,
 But people who speak a little bit of Spanish can quickly conclude that Portuguese is so much like it that you don't have to learn it separately.
 Pre-Modern observatories are nowadays obsolete,
 So they were often built in cities or on campuses,
 Most modern research telescopes are huge facilities that are built in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami is the viewing of cherry blossom,
 In China, peach blossoms were the favorite flowers,
 The first Cherry Blossom festivals of Japan were organized by the Emperor and were only meant for him and other aristocrats at the Imperial court.
 Plants look their best in a natural environment, which means you have to resist the temptation to remove even just one species.
 When you collect monsters during a visit to a landscaped garden,
 Singapore is over the whole a very safe place to stay,
 But if you're in the high tropics,
 There are also some buses going in a northern direction to Hebron, the burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Isaac, Jacob, Abraham, and their wives.
 Look good at the bus you're taking,
 Inland waterways can be a good holiday destination.
 You can visit castles in the Loire Valley or the Rhine Valley,
 They also give popular walking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of Christianity,
 People who do not believe in Christian countries and Non-Christians have also adopted many traditions that belong to the holiday.
 There is a tradition whereby you stay up all night,
 For this tradition,
 In traditional churches, a Easter Vigil is often held on the Saturday evening of the Easter weekend.
 All the animals that originally came to the Islands,
 Because of the long distance from the continent, it was not possible for mammals to make the journey.
 Since man set foot on the Galapagos,
 During the winter,
 There is a good chance that you could see the northern lights,
 The areas are sparsely populated,
 The Japanese work environment is structured and more formal than in the Western world.
 Pants are standard work clothing and colleagues call each other by their last name or job title.
 Oneness on the work floor is of crucial importance. The focus is on group performances instead of the rewarding of individual work performances.
 Workers often need the approval of their supervisors before they can make a decision, and they are expected to follow the instructions of their supervisors without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.16536475448924481, 'precisions': [0.6084482651988373, 0.33707197994326055, 0.2146341463414634, 0.14091047503045068], 'brevity_penalty': 0.5892449233113397, 'length_ratio': 0.6540593018081793, 'translation_length': 16169, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 40.12532251346162, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.7120305057099685, 'scores': [0.5384817719459534, 0.7683479189872742, 0.35108548402786255, 0.8205793499946594, 0.4054783284664154, 0.8144325017929077, 0.8727456331253052, 0.8681251406669617, 0.7932508587837219, 0.8582984805107117, 0.9081437587738037, 0.7142327427864075, 0.9076303839683533, 0.842731773853302, 0.8511765599250793, 0.8659517765045166, 0.8669877648353577, 0.39944779872894287, 0.8888798356056213, 0.8306374549865723, 0.9306195378303528, 0.9233159422874451, 0.8722729682922363, 0.7874016165733337, 0.500150203704834, 0.9122228622436523, 0.6921985149383545, 0.7253254055976868, 0.4025309681892395, 0.9429730176925659, 0.5892439484596252, 0.6715474724769592, 0.6508067846298218, 0.731713593006134, 0.8332706093788147, 0.736360490322113, 0.7045695185661316, 0.827695369720459, 0.35852673649787903, 0.8627462983131409, 0.8241954445838928, 0.7287097573280334, 0.5316693782806396, 0.935416579246521, 0.8841175436973572, 0.442350834608078, 0.8335152864456177, 0.7088752388954163, 0.8967545628547668, 0.4061109721660614, 0.927702009677887, 0.8530026078224182, 0.8722832202911377, 0.8865788578987122, 0.8895928859710693, 0.41425326466560364, 0.7903881669044495, 0.7176016569137573, 0.8985385894775391, 0.9084785580635071, 0.7397434115409851, 0.4121333956718445, 0.7347183227539062, 0.5868690013885498, 0.8674692511558533, 0.8885111808776855, 0.8362658619880676, 0.6438410878181458, 0.9034244418144226, 0.8669504523277283, 0.5109298825263977, 0.8838102221488953, 0.39069458842277527, 0.857716977596283, 0.3294517993927002, 0.4645867943763733, 0.6704683899879456, 0.6638830304145813, 0.5073423981666565, 0.8802392482757568, 0.8873122930526733, 0.6466935276985168, 0.5378475785255432, 0.7659496665000916, 0.7830491662025452, 0.6465899348258972, 0.4294436275959015, 0.8819306492805481, 0.9008864760398865, 0.8579570651054382, 0.68154376745224, 0.842873215675354, 0.4141217768192291, 0.8851233720779419, 0.652095377445221, 0.9342991709709167, 0.8920849561691284, 0.6218519806861877, 0.48651960492134094, 0.44233784079551697, 0.8881966471672058, 0.6797208189964294, 0.8058773875236511, 0.9414517283439636, 0.8377639651298523, 0.636746346950531, 0.8444010019302368, 0.348248690366745, 0.829799473285675, 0.7572578191757202, 0.8650803565979004, 0.9393623471260071, 0.9468883872032166, 0.8903233408927917, 0.6501176953315735, 0.7361688613891602, 0.8930062651634216, 0.8851689100265503, 0.9639609456062317, 0.6400508880615234, 0.3975224196910858, 0.6742308735847473, 0.7819296717643738, 0.8878908753395081, 0.7603550553321838, 0.41603562235832214, 0.8455619812011719, 0.8685815930366516, 0.8719276785850525, 0.4664284884929657, 0.785269021987915, 0.8136274218559265, 0.7406669855117798, 0.8612054586410522, 0.4706422984600067, 0.3064473867416382, 0.6454210877418518, 0.5072185397148132, 0.9585031867027283, 0.619353711605072, 0.9122437834739685, 0.6573813557624817, 0.9203060865402222, 0.6613971590995789, 0.3213288486003876, 0.8342351317405701, 0.3284303843975067, 0.9200646281242371, 0.8574044108390808, 0.887013852596283, 0.5249387621879578, 0.6302996277809143, 0.6270507574081421, 0.8538013100624084, 0.6227607131004333, 0.7025927901268005, 0.8211457133293152, 0.6459065675735474, 0.5643201470375061, 0.8820176720619202, 0.804023265838623, 0.49008676409721375, 0.3167540729045868, 0.801130473613739, 0.8419349789619446, 0.8208197951316833, 0.8858901858329773, 0.8652601838111877, 0.8392104506492615, 0.8522537350654602, 0.8191798329353333, 0.8348658084869385, 0.8684908747673035, 0.627128005027771, 0.6039455533027649, 0.8740546107292175, 0.4932731091976166, 0.6302713751792908, 0.745128333568573, 0.6936138272285461, 0.859169065952301, 0.8898422122001648, 0.5472835898399353, 0.9239936470985413, 0.8887233138084412, 0.29321375489234924, 0.9577510356903076, 0.6562148332595825, 0.716982901096344, 0.8162947297096252, 0.8242702484130859, 0.47821033000946045, 0.6805732846260071, 0.29189333319664, 0.5776212215423584, 0.78811115026474, 0.7711424231529236, 0.4124651253223419, 0.43514755368232727, 0.7198589444160461, 0.8500087261199951, 0.7457024455070496, 0.7727082371711731, 0.6242905855178833, 0.8789022564888, 0.8583948016166687, 0.6990806460380554, 0.8216475248336792, 0.4879254996776581, 0.9120053648948669, 0.5663940906524658, 0.9114909172058105, 0.6229866147041321, 0.5201515555381775, 0.7422923445701599, 0.5395798683166504, 0.9312161803245544, 0.472902774810791, 0.8681973814964294, 0.8670048117637634, 0.45897892117500305, 0.5921767354011536, 0.7796118855476379, 0.8703650832176208, 0.8949669003486633, 0.7441683411598206, 0.7888597249984741, 0.7858603596687317, 0.8977141976356506, 0.8334050178527832, 0.7999058365821838, 0.8827542662620544, 0.8471502065658569, 0.8583410382270813, 0.4986785352230072, 0.8263781666755676, 0.8355198502540588, 0.4539821147918701, 0.9015680551528931, 0.8903844356536865, 0.8652167916297913, 0.5694893002510071, 0.5273581147193909, 0.7499069571495056, 0.36767348647117615, 0.9147290587425232, 0.8504713177680969, 0.6557403802871704, 0.5024389028549194, 0.9242933392524719, 0.8734774589538574, 0.44070544838905334, 0.5668376088142395, 0.9536132216453552, 0.5379014611244202, 0.8046473860740662, 0.9234674572944641, 0.8734146952629089, 0.8197310566902161, 0.8672680854797363, 0.9034643769264221, 0.8308377265930176, 0.7881736159324646, 0.833339512348175, 0.9145575761795044, 0.7926048636436462, 0.8685908913612366, 0.8575457334518433, 0.3959021270275116, 0.9206860065460205, 0.862050473690033, 0.8417990803718567, 0.685320258140564, 0.8094558119773865, 0.7454215288162231, 0.3867413401603699, 0.7755011916160583, 0.9368683099746704, 0.6043375134468079, 0.9268153309822083, 0.5863637328147888, 0.738854706287384, 0.811005711555481, 0.8893993496894836, 0.9225250482559204, 0.9354396462440491, 0.8742977976799011, 0.819638192653656, 0.3767549395561218, 0.8976356387138367, 0.882509708404541, 0.784257709980011, 0.87725430727005, 0.7469469904899597, 0.6671772003173828, 0.6461181640625, 0.42335692048072815, 0.8431350588798523, 0.5329360961914062, 0.6990581154823303, 0.8989092707633972, 0.8790731430053711, 0.6737930178642273, 0.5312461853027344, 0.8558824062347412, 0.42350274324417114, 0.7790969014167786, 0.8257574439048767, 0.8865346312522888, 0.8433143496513367, 0.8898078799247742, 0.7958303689956665, 0.7306849360466003, 0.6322474479675293, 0.5832048654556274, 0.4430410861968994, 0.5664955377578735, 0.8393427729606628, 0.8563820719718933, 0.4070564806461334, 0.4259156584739685, 0.63411945104599, 0.5674692392349243, 0.3368817865848541, 0.42181912064552307, 0.8429988026618958, 0.839499831199646, 0.8685093522071838, 0.9164969325065613, 0.8129302263259888, 0.5562648177146912, 0.7419402599334717, 0.3673068583011627, 0.8387715220451355, 0.924271285533905, 0.33658066391944885, 0.5723088979721069, 0.7796373963356018, 0.8705602288246155, 0.4662174880504608, 0.6056468486785889, 0.8074464201927185, 0.684292733669281, 0.462242990732193, 0.7991032600402832, 0.678791880607605, 0.6310381293296814, 0.7897326350212097, 0.6666246056556702, 0.6996574997901917, 0.4298495352268219, 0.8263134360313416, 0.38108423352241516, 0.7637360692024231, 0.7247746586799622, 0.9062795042991638, 0.6582474112510681, 0.8053637146949768, 0.8630386590957642, 0.4168199896812439, 0.5202776193618774, 0.5451317429542542, 0.8214383721351624, 0.6839587092399597, 0.8767085075378418, 0.6719361543655396, 0.8337175250053406, 0.7775382995605469, 0.63243168592453, 0.7966666221618652, 0.7264843583106995, 0.4377622902393341, 0.40636324882507324, 0.45932328701019287, 0.7994397878646851, 0.8048050999641418, 0.292334645986557, 0.7001067996025085, 0.8478821516036987, 0.8365960717201233, 0.9073014259338379, 0.3832220137119293, 0.7633306980133057, 0.4655376672744751, 0.3842385709285736, 0.894756019115448, 0.3238668143749237, 0.8625413179397583, 0.6224402785301208, 0.8665392398834229, 0.869814932346344, 0.8790104389190674, 0.5439279675483704, 0.9555739760398865, 0.8988862633705139, 0.8277798295021057, 0.4083476960659027, 0.7840350866317749, 0.7971001267433167, 0.6171444654464722, 0.5244007706642151, 0.8182626962661743, 0.6384548544883728, 0.5675951838493347, 0.538851797580719, 0.774318277835846, 0.6820977330207825, 0.4584486186504364, 0.8434680104255676, 0.8390385508537292, 0.892939031124115, 0.5317067503929138, 0.7912770509719849, 0.5301182866096497, 0.7970456480979919, 0.5471892952919006, 0.8089621663093567, 0.8759438395500183, 0.9100465774536133, 0.945415735244751, 0.9344626665115356, 0.7581184506416321, 0.5641955733299255, 0.8410034775733948, 0.5343568921089172, 0.8011865019798279, 0.5597363710403442, 0.40864792466163635, 0.9056037068367004, 0.8968462944030762, 0.8965943455696106, 0.7342074513435364, 0.3752325475215912, 0.5175054669380188, 0.3938812017440796, 0.48416370153427124, 0.7019859552383423, 0.5534994006156921, 0.4461771547794342, 0.5420839190483093, 0.8688142895698547, 0.7440765500068665, 0.4104680120944977, 0.44602730870246887, 0.6221778392791748, 0.6483436226844788, 0.37893015146255493, 0.4956369698047638, 0.9089259505271912, 0.42796799540519714, 0.7366135120391846, 0.483693927526474, 0.9087033271789551, 0.7482919096946716, 0.8615480065345764, 0.47219303250312805, 0.5743355751037598, 0.8704984784126282, 0.4690898656845093, 0.5300773978233337, 0.7826153635978699, 0.5789121985435486, 0.716407060623169, 0.8745735287666321, 0.8618133664131165, 0.8556628823280334, 0.8103221654891968, 0.5488998293876648, 0.5618726015090942, 0.8338558077812195, 0.8476300835609436, 0.7154804468154907, 0.8258572220802307, 0.7237386107444763, 0.33949407935142517, 0.860106885433197, 0.6174038052558899, 0.7634278535842896, 0.6590235829353333, 0.8904815316200256, 0.668121874332428, 0.8839643597602844, 0.9181703329086304, 0.4320851266384125, 0.7175933718681335, 0.8710496425628662, 0.4920046329498291, 0.8267415761947632, 0.7908840775489807, 0.6588860154151917, 0.4405333697795868, 0.8059940934181213, 0.5230903625488281, 0.8992992043495178, 0.5773797631263733, 0.46149688959121704, 0.81134432554245, 0.8768298029899597, 0.48943081498146057, 0.8595111966133118, 0.8999074101448059, 0.9143873453140259, 0.862768292427063, 0.7827940583229065, 0.4842529594898224, 0.7427569031715393, 0.607072651386261, 0.7181212306022644, 0.8659260869026184, 0.8742608428001404, 0.5931704640388489, 0.5371688604354858, 0.6823838949203491, 0.7438200116157532, 0.9198262095451355, 0.9092311263084412, 0.4365476965904236, 0.41924989223480225, 0.8451975584030151, 0.8629364371299744, 0.8350264430046082, 0.4147704839706421, 0.7705502510070801, 0.43296191096305847, 0.49218446016311646, 0.5989270806312561, 0.833896815776825, 0.41786250472068787, 0.8030558228492737, 0.42870113253593445, 0.8463045954704285, 0.8774937391281128, 0.30848827958106995, 0.6798303723335266, 0.879543125629425, 0.37174418568611145, 0.5100491642951965, 0.6544262766838074, 0.7447124719619751, 0.8327857255935669, 0.6983281970024109, 0.8564884066581726, 0.44661077857017517, 0.6442590355873108, 0.6136486530303955, 0.46769407391548157, 0.5497786402702332, 0.453635573387146, 0.2685626745223999, 0.9010531306266785, 0.834944486618042, 0.621513843536377, 0.7806751728057861, 0.3982841670513153, 0.562156617641449, 0.6372933983802795, 0.5892871022224426, 0.5652039051055908, 0.8016744256019592, 0.6642064452171326, 0.4295178949832916, 0.7385260462760925, 0.5293335914611816, 0.605448842048645, 0.7229899764060974, 0.5656335949897766, 0.8794020414352417, 0.6568084359169006, 0.3319150507450104, 0.6438441872596741, 0.9120659232139587, 0.8909613490104675, 0.751326858997345, 0.3715853989124298, 0.9407069087028503, 0.8657108545303345, 0.8467179536819458, 0.6707615256309509, 0.6620158553123474, 0.7779857516288757, 0.8786099553108215, 0.8105904459953308, 0.7451524138450623, 0.834941565990448, 0.6332916021347046, 0.8861998915672302, 0.904812753200531, 0.9065569043159485, 0.6271994709968567, 0.8410418629646301, 0.3220074772834778, 0.8014065027236938, 0.4839614927768707, 0.7793920040130615, 0.8943023681640625, 0.6939781904220581, 0.8110036253929138, 0.5916920304298401, 0.83400958776474, 0.9192606806755066, 0.8998799920082092, 0.350609689950943, 0.8679016828536987, 0.739331066608429, 0.5700680017471313, 0.8427360653877258, 0.5247949361801147, 0.7928293943405151, 0.8604803085327148, 0.8357221484184265, 0.911901593208313, 0.8730162978172302, 0.6484910845756531, 0.3871418535709381, 0.5718988180160522, 0.3441266715526581, 0.7183619141578674, 0.5363953113555908, 0.6376998424530029, 0.8714953064918518, 0.8595617413520813, 0.7464222311973572, 0.7615376114845276, 0.5453366041183472, 0.301831990480423, 0.7768539786338806, 0.8214382529258728, 0.27021005749702454, 0.8071181178092957, 0.8972548246383667, 0.40424808859825134, 0.5351662635803223, 0.8012256622314453, 0.9037312865257263, 0.9347227811813354, 0.9064585566520691, 0.9221410155296326, 0.6003924012184143, 0.46021410822868347, 0.86897873878479, 0.8432816863059998, 0.8178703188896179, 0.8178829550743103, 0.39691993594169617, 0.5976174473762512, 0.8598869442939758, 0.722964346408844, 0.9034802317619324, 0.5003013610839844, 0.6829379200935364, 0.898440420627594, 0.8989163041114807, 0.7862417101860046, 0.42739006876945496, 0.6654672622680664, 0.9192134737968445, 0.34139522910118103, 0.8515874743461609, 0.3814959228038788, 0.8570138812065125, 0.4511324167251587, 0.9146130084991455, 0.8593843579292297, 0.9179894328117371, 0.9077842235565186, 0.6774652600288391, 0.5934174060821533, 0.8487733602523804, 0.8544240593910217, 0.8987005352973938, 0.8949334025382996, 0.8757101893424988, 0.844093918800354, 0.8875793814659119, 0.9173244833946228, 0.8770619034767151, 0.43044498562812805, 0.9042423963546753, 0.6214497089385986, 0.858858585357666, 0.8808237314224243, 0.9273220896720886, 0.8684813380241394, 0.5816894769668579, 0.8385671973228455, 0.9043311476707458, 0.38756582140922546, 0.6745816469192505, 0.6264016628265381, 0.7436701059341431, 0.9483442902565002, 0.8229550123214722, 0.8814961314201355, 0.6830601096153259, 0.6655843257904053, 0.3147541880607605, 0.5798588395118713, 0.9195576310157776, 0.6172006726264954, 0.9240177869796753, 0.6271086931228638, 0.9059094786643982, 0.8735256791114807, 0.7108032703399658, 0.4734688401222229, 0.821980357170105, 0.6916175484657288, 0.9088491797447205, 0.7969127297401428, 0.7855774760246277, 0.9272715449333191, 0.40347540378570557, 0.9011222124099731, 0.8191409707069397, 0.6133299469947815, 0.8692865371704102, 0.3169423043727875, 0.4103979170322418, 0.6331273317337036, 0.8100940585136414, 0.6486338973045349, 0.8834712505340576, 0.8815054297447205, 0.7467285394668579, 0.8794440627098083, 0.9295451641082764, 0.6090438961982727, 0.5724671483039856, 0.8153069615364075, 0.6000820398330688, 0.7904672026634216, 0.862070620059967, 0.9031650424003601, 0.7017521858215332, 0.9013473987579346, 0.7307034730911255, 0.8996712565422058, 0.8236870169639587, 0.8793735504150391, 0.6255044341087341, 0.49227672815322876, 0.8631929755210876, 0.8593979477882385, 0.7831500172615051, 0.8075602054595947, 0.6298503279685974, 0.3871100842952728, 0.8383667469024658, 0.8555874824523926, 0.9208954572677612, 0.9569490551948547, 0.928274929523468, 0.848455011844635, 0.894900918006897, 0.6743148565292358, 0.8500052094459534, 0.8647769093513489, 0.3212333023548126, 0.7013341784477234, 0.2645609974861145, 0.5112012624740601, 0.931856632232666, 0.8668782114982605, 0.771003782749176, 0.8677367568016052, 0.8300541043281555, 0.9331563115119934, 0.9003324508666992, 0.7092135548591614, 0.92768794298172, 0.6594315767288208, 0.4097996950149536, 0.39834532141685486, 0.6205169558525085, 0.8443737626075745, 0.9014362692832947, 0.7377593517303467, 0.8328644633293152, 0.6087893843650818, 0.8895975947380066, 0.859789252281189, 0.4206773042678833, 0.7506461143493652, 0.5834978818893433, 0.8479837775230408, 0.48707160353660583, 0.39947089552879333, 0.7896102070808411, 0.8825242519378662, 0.32866501808166504, 0.8113828301429749, 0.8567163348197937, 0.4968685209751129, 0.9041240215301514, 0.5288828015327454, 0.6646284461021423, 0.9413653016090393, 0.5187940001487732, 0.9087114930152893, 0.7387136220932007, 0.3429517447948456, 0.8762943744659424, 0.8143488168716431, 0.525130569934845, 0.5366010069847107, 0.9034124612808228, 0.6770548224449158, 0.8284009099006653, 0.5912390351295471, 0.8913081288337708, 0.5973113775253296, 0.46442553400993347, 0.7456538677215576, 0.842959463596344, 0.6288570165634155, 0.43435510993003845, 0.39492106437683105, 0.5938469767570496, 0.3790932297706604, 0.6842296123504639, 0.7150905132293701, 0.7616341710090637, 0.7922677993774414, 0.8094310164451599, 0.7976725697517395, 0.904591977596283, 0.4805821180343628, 0.8460620045661926, 0.5756776928901672, 0.5676630139350891, 0.6647663712501526, 0.3624248206615448, 0.37447869777679443, 0.5210583806037903, 0.8865547776222229, 0.4426773488521576, 0.6608201265335083, 0.9022272825241089, 0.6929851770401001, 0.8649196028709412, 0.4121372401714325, 0.7997018694877625, 0.8452420234680176, 0.749267041683197, 0.5077733993530273, 0.9127054810523987, 0.3367559611797333, 0.894899845123291, 0.8449549078941345, 0.6648546457290649, 0.8844152688980103, 0.5896729230880737, 0.8574936985969543, 0.8990293145179749, 0.7458577752113342, 0.764233410358429, 0.83890700340271, 0.8934465050697327, 0.8764610886573792, 0.44069400429725647, 0.890181839466095, 0.7284718155860901, 0.6338221430778503, 0.8900567889213562, 0.7084311842918396, 0.42498621344566345, 0.9040543437004089, 0.42320847511291504, 0.4233214557170868, 0.7403176426887512, 0.6461505889892578, 0.8831608295440674, 0.3939550220966339, 0.8505775332450867, 0.5587465763092041, 0.9036058187484741, 0.9170264601707458, 0.8238441944122314, 0.8808956742286682, 0.8139167428016663, 0.7216418981552124, 0.9126259684562683, 0.8244349360466003, 0.6538119912147522, 0.610619843006134, 0.8198508620262146, 0.8158247470855713, 0.4024505317211151, 0.6452755928039551, 0.5524783730506897, 0.6579181551933289, 0.590853750705719, 0.8123378157615662, 0.6374489665031433, 0.8525276780128479, 0.4838627278804779, 0.4675404727458954, 0.7008556723594666, 0.9042779207229614, 0.880500853061676, 0.6515603065490723, 0.9075035452842712, 0.6742647886276245, 0.9119250178337097, 0.9245283007621765, 0.42287591099739075, 0.6811312437057495, 0.6164810657501221, 0.5954350233078003, 0.9288590550422668, 0.7505232691764832, 0.8556872010231018, 0.9460433125495911, 0.5026833415031433, 0.8401599526405334, 0.8798772096633911, 0.799157440662384, 0.8509733080863953, 0.7734185457229614, 0.46818000078201294, 0.2999555170536041, 0.6927680373191833, 0.8943707942962646, 0.823412299156189, 0.30882224440574646, 0.8425573110580444, 0.35090067982673645, 0.5741528272628784, 0.3360951244831085, 0.33948811888694763, 0.8674590587615967, 0.367974191904068, 0.7382198572158813, 0.588441789150238, 0.705329179763794, 0.8826943635940552, 0.8756729364395142, 0.7271194458007812, 0.609510600566864, 0.8067421913146973, 0.6564818024635315, 0.9571666121482849, 0.9197047352790833, 0.8572823405265808, 0.761493444442749, 0.5139472484588623, 0.7918967604637146, 0.429391473531723, 0.8223373889923096, 0.9113740921020508, 0.8520414233207703, 0.3546470105648041, 0.8092195391654968, 0.4993782341480255, 0.8781685829162598, 0.7374752759933472, 0.7244850397109985, 0.6436325907707214, 0.4075843393802643, 0.9244754910469055, 0.7611110806465149, 0.7332751154899597, 0.8821387887001038, 0.5297245383262634, 0.9371174573898315, 0.7163078784942627, 0.744820773601532, 0.3833502233028412, 0.774497926235199, 0.8170965313911438, 0.535182774066925, 0.4482073485851288, 0.4055843651294708, 0.7162362933158875, 0.5049094557762146, 0.8968595266342163, 0.5556736588478088, 0.6163405776023865, 0.9603231549263, 0.8083194494247437, 0.6435412764549255, 0.8492121696472168, 0.6879482269287109, 0.5424099564552307, 0.9461975693702698, 0.5767713189125061, 0.8162460923194885, 0.8605672717094421, 0.8784905076026917, 0.5036830306053162, 0.7066264748573303, 0.54327791929245, 0.9081101417541504, 0.4253680408000946, 0.8915750980377197, 0.7036058306694031, 0.8691629767417908, 0.859172523021698, 0.8022751212120056, 0.6005721688270569, 0.4335513114929199, 0.722794771194458, 0.5926282405853271, 0.6898754835128784, 0.4438553750514984, 0.4573099613189697, 0.5737493634223938, 0.5424391627311707, 0.8863585591316223, 0.867094099521637, 0.8090264201164246, 0.8825691342353821]}